Utah statutes.
58-9-707.   Records of trustee -- Contents.
(1)  The trustee shall keep an orderly record of all agreements.
(2)  The record shall contain:
(a)  the name and address of the person making a payment;
(b)  the date and the amount of each payment made;
(c)  the date and amount of each withdrawal and to whom paid; and
(d)  the name of the bank or trust company depository.
